Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.430

Electronic wills—Execution—Choice of law.

A will executed electronically but not in compliance with RCW 11.12.440(1) is an electronic will under RCW 11.12.400 through 11.12.491 if executed in compliance with the law of the jurisdiction where the testator is:

(1) Physically located when the will is signed; or

(2) Domiciled or resides when the will is signed or when the testator dies.

[ 2021 c 140 s 1004.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 140 ss 1001-1016: See note following RCW 11.12.400.